Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 18. Innocent Owners

§ 35-11-1801.
Definition of innocent owner.

“Innocent owner” means a person who did not cause or contribute to the source of contamination and who is one (1) of the following:

An owner of real property that has become contaminated as a result of a release or migration of contaminants from a source not located on or at the real property;

An owner of real property who can show with respect to the property that the owner has no liability for contamination under section 107(a) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, 42 U.S.C. § 9607(a), because the owner can show a defense as provided in section 107(b) of that act (42 U.S.C. § 9607(b));

An owner of real property who at the time of becoming the owner of the property did not know or should not have reasonably known about the presence of contamination on the property;

A lender or fiduciary who owns or holds a security interest in land, unless the lender or fiduciary participated in the management of a site at the time that the owner or operator thereof caused a release or migration of contaminants;

A unit of state or local government which acquired ownership or control through bankruptcy, tax delinquency, abandonment or other circumstances in which the government acquires title by virtue of its function as sovereign, unless the state or local government contributed to the contamination;

A bona fide prospective purchaser; or

A surface owner if the source of the contamination was a pipeline running under or across the land of the surface owner and the surface owner was not involved in the installation, operation or maintenance of the pipeline.

No person who owns or operates lands or facilities subject to permitting or corrective action requirements of the hazardous waste rules and regulations promulgated under W.S. 35-11-503(d) shall be considered an innocent owner, nor shall any hazardous waste generator who may be subject to corrective action requirements of such rules and regulations be considered an innocent owner.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1; 2013 ch. 38, § 1, effective February 14, 2013; 2015 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

added (a)(vi).

Laws 2013, ch. 38, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (a)(vii) and made related changes.

§ 35-11-1802.
Immunity for innocent owners.

An innocent owner is not liable for investigation, monitoring, remediation or other response action regarding contamination attributable to a release, discharge or migration of contaminants on his property.

To be eligible for immunity under this act, a person shall:

Grant to the department or to a person designated by the department, reasonable access to the land for purposes of investigation, monitoring or remediation;

Comply with any requirements established by the department that are necessary to maintain state authorization to implement federal regulatory programs;

Not use the real property in a manner that causes exposure of the public to harmful environmental conditions; and

Comply with any engineering or institutional controls applicable to the real property.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-1803.
Limitations.

Any person who knowingly transfers, conveys or obtains an interest in land to avoid liability for contamination, remediation or compliance with any provision of this act shall not be an innocent owner.

Notwithstanding the provisions of W.S.

35-11-1802

, an innocent owner who undertakes a cleanup of his property must comply with all applicable provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).